dictionaries/hr_HR/hr_HR.aff
FLAG long
SFX WM Y      42
SFX WM eti    mem        eti
SFX WM eti    meš        eti
SFX WM eti    me         eti
SFX WM eti    memo       eti
SFX WM eti    mete       eti
SFX WM eti    mu         eti
SFX WM eti    eh         eti
SFX WM eti    e          eti
SFX WM eti    esmo       eti
SFX WM eti    este       eti
SFX WM eti    eše        eti
SFX WM eti    mi         eti
SFX WM eti    mimo       eti
SFX WM eti    mite       eti
SFX WM eti    eo         eti
SFX WM eti    ela        eti
SFX WM eti    elo        eti
SFX WM eti    eli        eti
SFX WM eti    ele        eti
SFX WM eti    evši       eti
SFX WM eti    et         eti
SFX WM uti    mem        uti
SFX WM uti    meš        uti
SFX WM uti    me         uti
SFX WM uti    memo       uti
SFX WM uti    mete       uti
SFX WM uti    mu         uti
SFX WM uti    uh         uti
SFX WM uti    u          uti
SFX WM uti    usmo       uti
SFX WM uti    uste       uti
SFX WM uti    uše        uti
SFX WM uti    mi         uti
SFX WM uti    mimo       uti
SFX WM uti    mite       uti
SFX WM uti    uo         uti
SFX WM uti    ula        uti
SFX WM uti    ulo        uti
SFX WM uti    uli        uti
SFX WM uti    ule        uti
SFX WM uti    uvši       uti
SFX WM uti    ut         uti

SFX WL Y      21
SFX WL eti    nem        eti
SFX WL eti    neš        eti
SFX WL eti    ne         eti
SFX WL eti    nemo       eti
SFX WL eti    nete       eti
SFX WL eti    nu         eti
SFX WL eti    eh         eti
SFX WL eti    e          eti
SFX WL eti    esmo       eti
SFX WL eti    este       eti
SFX WL eti    eše        eti
SFX WL eti    ni         eti
SFX WL eti    nimo       eti
SFX WL eti    nite       eti
SFX WL eti    eo         eti
SFX WL eti    ela        eti
SFX WL eti    elo        eti
SFX WL eti    eli        eti
SFX WL eti    ele        eti
SFX WL eti    evši       eti
SFX WL eti    et         eti

SFX WK Y      19
SFX WK ati    im         ati
SFX WK ati    iš         ati
SFX WK ati    i          ati
SFX WK ati    imo        ati
SFX WK ati    ite        ati
SFX WK ati    e          ati
SFX WK ati    ah         ati
SFX WK ati    a          ati
SFX WK ati    aše        ati
SFX WK ati    asmo       ati
SFX WK ati    aste       ati
SFX WK ati    ahu        ati
SFX WK ati    ao         ati
SFX WK ati    ala        ati
SFX WK ati    alo        ati
SFX WK ati    ali        ati
SFX WK ati    ale        ati
SFX WK ati    avši       ati
SFX WK ati    at         ati

SFX WJ Y      21
SFX WJ sti    sem        sti
SFX WJ sti    seš        sti
SFX WJ sti    se         sti
SFX WJ sti    semo       sti
SFX WJ sti    sete       sti
SFX WJ sti    su         sti
SFX WJ sti    soh        sti
SFX WJ sti    se         sti
SFX WJ sti    sosmo      sti
SFX WJ sti    soste      sti
SFX WJ sti    soše       sti
SFX WJ sti    si         sti
SFX WJ sti    simo       sti
SFX WJ sti    site       sti
SFX WJ sti    sao        sti
SFX WJ sti    sla        sti
SFX WJ sti    slo        sti
SFX WJ sti    sli        sti
SFX WJ sti    sle        sti
SFX WJ sti    savši      sti
SFX WJ sti    st         sti

SFX WI Y      21
SFX WI sti    dem        sti
SFX WI sti    deš        sti
SFX WI sti    de         sti
SFX WI sti    demo       sti
SFX WI sti    dete       sti
SFX WI sti    du         sti
SFX WI sti    doh        sti
SFX WI sti    dosmo      sti
SFX WI sti    doste      sti
SFX WI sti    doše       sti
SFX WI sti    di         sti
SFX WI sti    dimo       sti
SFX WI sti    dite       sti
SFX WI sti    o          [^o]sti
SFX WI osti   o          [o]sti
SFX WI sti    la         sti
SFX WI sti    lo         sti
SFX WI sti    li         sti
SFX WI sti    le         sti
SFX WI sti    vši        sti
SFX WI sti    st         sti

SFX WH Y      20
SFX WH sti    zem        sti
SFX WH sti    zeš        sti
SFX WH sti    ze         sti
SFX WH sti    zemo       sti
SFX WH sti    zete       sti
SFX WH sti    zu         sti
SFX WH sti    zoh        sti
SFX WH sti    zosmo      sti
SFX WH sti    zoste      sti
SFX WH sti    zoše       sti
SFX WH sti    zi         sti
SFX WH sti    zimo       sti
SFX WH sti    zite       sti
SFX WH sti    zao        sti
SFX WH sti    zla        sti
SFX WH sti    zlo        sti
SFX WH sti    zli        sti
SFX WH sti    zle        sti
SFX WH sti    zavši      sti
SFX WH sti    st         sti

SFX WG Y      20
SFX WG psti   bem        psti
SFX WG psti   beš        psti
SFX WG psti   be         psti
SFX WG psti   bemo       psti
SFX WG psti   bete       psti
SFX WG psti   bu         psti
SFX WG psti   boh        psti
SFX WG psti   bosmo      psti
SFX WG psti   boste      psti
SFX WG psti   boše       psti
SFX WG psti   bi         psti
SFX WG psti   bimo       psti
SFX WG psti   bite       psti
SFX WG psti   bao        psti
SFX WG psti   bla        psti
SFX WG psti   blo        psti
SFX WG psti   bli        psti
SFX WG psti   ble        psti
SFX WG psti   bavši      psti
SFX WG psti   pst        psti

SFX WF Y      20
SFX WF sti    tem        sti
SFX WF sti    teš        sti
SFX WF sti    te         sti
SFX WF sti    temo       sti
SFX WF sti    tete       sti
SFX WF sti    tu         sti
SFX WF sti    toh        sti
SFX WF sti    tosmo      sti
SFX WF sti    toste      sti
SFX WF sti    toše       sti
SFX WF sti    ti         sti
SFX WF sti    timo       sti
SFX WF sti    tite       sti
SFX WF sti    o          sti
SFX WF sti    la         sti
SFX WF sti    lo         sti
SFX WF sti    li         sti
SFX WF sti    le         sti
SFX WF sti    vši        sti
SFX WF sti    st         sti

SFX WE Y      21
SFX WE sti    dnem       sti
SFX WE sti    dneš       sti
SFX WE sti    dne        sti
SFX WE sti    dnemo      sti
SFX WE sti    dnete      sti
SFX WE sti    dnu        sti
SFX WE sti    doh        sti
SFX WE sti    de         sti
SFX WE sti    dosmo      sti
SFX WE sti    doste      sti
SFX WE sti    doše       sti
SFX WE sti    dni        sti
SFX WE sti    dnimo      sti
SFX WE sti    dnite      sti
SFX WE sti    o          sti
SFX WE sti    la         sti
SFX WE sti    lo         sti
SFX WE sti    li         sti
SFX WE sti    le         sti
SFX WE sti    vši        sti
SFX WE sti    st         sti

SFX WD Y      21
SFX WD ti     tem        sti
SFX WD ti     teš        sti
SFX WD ti     te         sti
SFX WD ti     temo       sti
SFX WD ti     tete       sti
SFX WD ti     tu         sti
SFX WD ti     toh        sti
SFX WD ti     te         sti
SFX WD ti     tosmo      sti
SFX WD ti     toste      sti
SFX WD ti     toše       sti
SFX WD ti     ti         sti
SFX WD ti     timo       sti
SFX WD ti     tite       sti
SFX WD ti     tao        sti
SFX WD ti     la         sti
SFX WD ti     lo         sti
SFX WD ti     li         sti
SFX WD ti     le         sti
SFX WD ti     tavši      sti
SFX WD ti     t          sti

SFX WC Y      21
SFX WC sti    tnem       sti
SFX WC sti    tneš       sti
SFX WC sti    tne        sti
SFX WC sti    tnemo      sti
SFX WC sti    tnete      sti
SFX WC sti    tnu        sti
SFX WC sti    toh        sti
SFX WC sti    te         sti
SFX WC sti    tosmo      sti
SFX WC sti    toste      sti
SFX WC sti    toše       sti
SFX WC sti    tni        sti
SFX WC sti    tnimo      sti
SFX WC sti    tnite      sti
SFX WC sti    o          sti
SFX WC sti    la         sti
SFX WC sti    lo         sti
SFX WC sti    li         sti
SFX WC sti    le         sti
SFX WC sti    vši        sti
SFX WC sti    st         sti

AF WM	# 154
AF WMUO	# 155
AF WL	# 156
AF WK	# 157
AF WJ	# 158
AF WJXJ	# 159
AF WI	# 160
AF WIWH	# 161
AF WH	# 162
AF WG	# 163
AF WF	# 164
AF WE	# 165
AF WD	# 166
AF WC	# 167
