dictionaries/hr_HR/hr_HR.dic
dopasti/165
dorasti/166
dovesti/161
gnjesti/164
gristi/162
iskrasti/160
ispasti/165
ispeti/156
isplesti/164
ispreplesti/164
ispresti/160
istresti/158
izažeti/154
izbosti/160
izdupsti/163
izgrepsti/163
izgristi/162
izjesti/160
izmesti/164
izmusti/162
izrasti/166
izuzeti/154
izvesti/161
ižeti/155
musti/162
nabosti/160
načeti/156
nadrasti/166
naduti/155
nadvesti/160
nagristi/162
najesti/160
nanesti/159
napasti/165
napeti/156
napresti/160
narasti/166
nasjesti/165
navesti/161
nazepsti/163
obosti/160
obrasti/166
obuzeti/154
ocvasti/164
odapeti/156
odgristi/162
odmesti/164
odnesti/158
odrasti/166
odsjesti/165
oduzeti/154
odvesti/161
ogrepsti/163
okrasti/160
omesti/164
opasti/165
oplesti/164
opresti/160
opresti/162
opsjesti/165
oteti/154
otpasti/165
otpočeti/156
otresti/158
ozepsti/163
pobosti/160
početi/156
podbosti/160
podgristi/162
poduzeti/154
podvesti/161
pojesti/160
pokrasti/160
pomesti/164
pomusti/162
popasti/158
popeti/156
porasti/166
posjesti/165
potkrasti/160
potpasti/165
potresti/158
povesti/161
pozaspati/157
predusresti/167
predvesti/160
pregristi/162
prejesti/160
preoteti/154
prepasti/165
preplesti/164
prerasti/166
presresti/167
pretrčati/157
pretresti/158
preuzeti/154
prevesti/161
pribosti/160
prigristi/162
prikrasti/160
pripasti/165
prirasti/166
prisjesti/165
privesti/161
probosti/160
procvasti/164
progristi/162
proizvesti/160
pronesti/158
propasti/165
propeti/156
prorasti/166
protresti/158
provesti/161
prozepsti/163
prožeti/154
rascvasti/164
raspasti/165
raspeti/156
rasplesti/164
raspresti/160
rastresti/158
razapeti/156
razrasti/166
razvesti/161
sapeti/156
saplesti/164
sažeti/154
sjesti/165
smesti/164
snesti/158
spasti/165
splesti/164
spopasti/165
sprovesti/160
srasti/166
sresti/167
stresti/158
susresti/167
svesti/161
ubosti/160
ugristi/162
ujesti/160
ukrasti/160
upasti/165
upeti/156
uplesti/164
urasti/164
uspeti/156
uvesti/161
uzdrhtati/157
uzeti/154
uzrasti/166
vesti/162
zabosti/160
začeti/156
zadrhtati/157
zagrepsti/163
zagristi/162
zamesti/164
zapasti/165
zapeti/156
zaplesti/164
započeti/156
zapodjeti/156
zaposjesti/165
zapresti/160
zarasti/166
zasjesti/165
zatresti/158
zauzeti/154
zavesti/161
